Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-728
Jurisdiction.

An offense committed in violation of section 66-727 shall be deemed an act committed in part in the principal office of the department. The Attorney General shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the county attorney in the prosecution of such offenses which may be conducted in any county in which the offender resides or has a place of business or in which the crime was committed.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 123.